Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska81-2003
Superintendent; power to adopt rules and regulations; seal; maintenance of office.

The Superintendent of Law Enforcement and Public Safety is hereby authorized to adopt, promulgate, and enforce rules and regulations, consistent with this act, to carry out sections 81-2001 to 81-2009, including the use, purpose, and contents of warning and violation cards. The Superintendent of Law Enforcement and Public Safety shall adopt an official seal for the use of the Nebraska State Patrol. The Superintendent of Law Enforcement and Public Safety shall maintain an office or offices for law enforcement and public safety in such places in the state as he or she may deem necessary to properly carry out the work and the administration of laws pertaining to the Nebraska State Patrol.

Laws 1937, c. 141, § 5, p. 508;

Laws 1941, c. 176, § 7, p. 691;

C.S.Supp.,1941, § 60-420;

R.S.1943, § 60-433;

Laws 1957, c. 366, § 41, p. 1274;

Laws 1959, c. 286, § 5, p. 1085;

R.S.1943, (1978), § 60-433;

Laws 1981, LB 541, § 3;

Laws 1985, LB 395, § 12;

Laws 2002, LB 470, § 5.

"This act", formerly defined in section 60-401 as meaning sections 60-401 to 60-430.06. For the last printed version of section 60-401 see the 1988 Reissue of Volume 3B.